District of Columbia statutes.
42-1902.10

Contents of declaration; where condominium contains convertible land; expandable, contractable and leasehold condominiums; easements; additionally required descriptions.

(a)

The declaration for every condominium shall contain:

(1)

The name of the condominium, which name shall include the word “condominium” or be followed by the words “a condominium”;

(2)

A legally sufficient description of the land submitted to this chapter;

(3)

A description or delineation of the boundaries of the units, including the horizontal (upper and lower) boundaries, if any, as well as the vertical (lateral or perimetric) boundaries;

(4)

A description or delineation of any limited common elements not covered by § 42-1902.06(5), showing or designating the unit or units to which each is assigned;

(5)

A description or delineation of all common elements not within the boundaries of any convertible lands which may subsequently be assigned as limited common elements, together with a statement that they may be so assigned and a description of the method whereby any such assignments shall be made in accordance with the provisions of § 42-1902.13. The description of the method whereby an assignment shall be made shall include the following information:

(A)

The name of any person who may assign the limited common elements;

(B)

The name of any person who must execute the assignment;

(C)

Whether or not the deed to a condominium unit will reflect the assignment, if previously made; and

(D)

If there is any limited common expense payable by the unit owners of a condominium unit to which the limited common elements pertain;

(6)

The allocation to each unit of an undivided interest in the common elements in accordance with the provisions of § 42-1902.11; and

(7)

Such other matters as the declarant deems appropriate.

(b)

If the condominium contains any convertible land the declaration shall also contain:

(1)

A legally sufficient description of each convertible land within the condominium;

(2)

A statement of the maximum number of units that may be created within each such convertible land;

(3)

A statement, with respect to each such convertible land, of the maximum percentage of the aggregate land and floor area of all units that may be created therein that may be occupied by units not restricted exclusively to residential use;

(4)

A statement of the extent to which any structure erected on any convertible land will be compatible with structures on other portions of the submitted land in terms of quality of construction, the principal materials to be used and architectural style;

(5)

A description of all other improvements that may be made in each convertible land within the condominium;

(6)

A statement that any units created within each convertible land will be substantially identical to the units on other portions of the submitted land, or a statement describing in detail what other types of units may be created therein; and

(7)

A description of the declarant’s reserved right, if any, to create limited common elements within any convertible land, or to designate common elements therein which may subsequently be assigned as limited common elements, in terms of the types, sizes, and maximum number of such elements within each such convertible land; provided, that the plats and plans recorded pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of § 42-1902.14 may be used to supplement information furnished pursuant to paragraphs (1), (4), (5), (6), and (7) of this subsection, and that paragraph (3) of this subsection need not be complied with if none of the units on other portions of the submitted land are restricted exclusively to residential use.

(c)

If the condominium is an expandable condominium the declaration shall also contain:

(1)

The explicit reservation of an option to expand the condominium;

(2)

A statement of any limitations on that option, including, without limitation, a statement as to whether the consent of any unit owners shall be required, and if so, a statement as to the method whereby such consent shall be ascertained; or a statement that there are no such limitations;

(3)

A time limit, not exceeding 5 years from the recording of the declaration, upon which the option to expand the condominium shall expire, together with a statement of the circumstances, if any, which will terminate that option prior to the expiration of the time limit so specified;

(4)

A legally sufficient description of all land that may be added to the condominium, henceforth referred to as “additional land”;

(5)

A statement as to whether, if any of the additional land is added to the condominium, all of it or any particular portion of it must be added, and if not, a statement of any limitations as to what portions may be added or a statement that there are no such limitations;

(6)

A statement as to whether portions of the additional land may be added to the condominium at different times, together with any limitations fixing the boundaries of those portions by legally sufficient descriptions regulating the order in which they may be added to the condominium;

(7)

A statement of any limitations as to the locations of any improvements that may be made on any portions of the additional land added to the condominium, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard;

(8)

A statement of the maximum number of units that may be created on the additional land. If portions of the additional land may be added to the condominium and the boundaries of those portions are fixed in accordance with paragraph (6) of this subsection, the declaration shall also state the maximum number of units that may be created on each portion added to the condominium. If portions of the additional land may be added to the condominium and the boundaries of those portions are not fixed in accordance with paragraph (6) of this subsection, then the declaration shall also state the maximum number of units per acre that may be created on any such portion added to the condominium;

(9)

A statement, with respect to the additional land and to any portion or portions thereof that may be added to the condominium, of the maximum percentage of the aggregate land and floor area of all units that may be created thereon that may be occupied by units not restricted exclusively to residential use;

(10)

A statement of the extent to which any structures erected on any portion of the additional land added to the condominium will be compatible with structures on the submitted land in terms of quality of construction, the principal materials to be used, and architectural style, or a statement that no assurances are made in those regards;

(11)

A description of all other improvements that will be made on any portion of the additional land added to the condominium, or a statement of any limitations as to what other improvements may be made thereon, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard;

(12)

A statement that any units created on any portion of the additional land added to the condominium will be substantially identical to the units on the submitted land, or a statement of any limitations as to what types of units may be created thereon, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard; and

(13)

A description of the declarant’s reserved right, if any, to create limited common elements within any portion of the additional land added to the condominium, or to designate common elements therein which may subsequently be assigned as limited common elements, in terms of the types, sizes, and maximum number of such elements within each such portion, or a statement that no assurances are made in those regards; provided, that the plats and plans recorded pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of § 42-1902.14 may be used to supplement information furnished pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), (6), (7), (10), (11), (12) and (13) of this subsection, and that paragraph (9) of this subsection need not be complied with if none of the units on the submitted land is restricted exclusively to residential use.

(d)

If the condominium is a contractable condominium the declaration shall also contain:

(1)

The explicit reservation of an option to contract the condominium;

(2)

A statement of any limitations on that option, including, without limitation, a statement as to whether the consent of any unit owners shall be required, and if so, a statement as to the method whereby such consent shall be ascertained; or a statement that there are no such limitations;

(3)

A time limit, not exceeding 5 years from the recording of the declaration, upon which the option to contract the condominium shall expire, together with a statement of the circumstances, if any, which will terminate that option prior to the expiration of the time limit so specified;

(4)

A legally sufficient description of all land that may be withdrawn from the condominium, henceforth referred to as “withdrawable land”;

(5)

A statement as to whether portions of the withdrawable land may be withdrawn from the condominium at different times, together with any limitations fixing the boundaries of those portions by legally sufficient descriptions clearly delineating such portions and regulating the order in which such portions may be withdrawn from the condominium; and

(6)

A legally sufficient description of all of the submitted land to which the option to contract the condominium does not extend; provided, that the plats recorded pursuant to § 42-1902.14(a) may be used to supplement information furnished pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5) and (6) of this subsection, and that paragraph (6) of this subsection shall not be construed in derogation of any right the declarant may have to terminate the condominium in accordance with the provisions of § 42-1902.27.

(e)

If the condominium is a leasehold condominium, then with respect to any ground lease or other leases the expiration or termination of which will or may terminate or contract the condominium, the declaration shall set forth:

(1)

The instrument number and date of recordation of each such lease;

(2)

The date upon which each such lease is due to expire and the rights, if any, to renew such lease and the conditions pertaining to any such renewal;

(3)

A statement as to whether any land or improvements, or both, will be owned by the unit owners in fee simple, and if so, either:

(A)

A description of the same, including without limitation a legally sufficient description of any such land; or

(B)

A statement of any rights the unit owners shall have to remove such improvements within a reasonable time after the expiration or termination of the lease or leases involved, or a statement that they shall have no such rights; and

(4)

A statement of the rights the unit owners shall have to redeem the reversion or any of the reversions, or a statement that they shall have no such rights; provided, that after the recording of the declaration, no lessor who executed the same, and no successor in interest to such lessor, shall have any right or power to terminate any part of the leasehold interest of any unit owner who makes timely payment of his share of the rent to the person or persons designated in the declaration for the receipt of such rent and who otherwise complies with all covenants which, if violated, would entitle the lessor to terminate the lease. Acquisition or reacquisition of such a leasehold interest by the owner of the reversion or remainder shall not cause a merger of the leasehold and fee simple interests unless all leasehold interests in the condominium are thus acquired or reacquired.

(f)

Wherever this section requires a legally sufficient description of land that is submitted to this chapter or that may be added to or withdrawn from the condominium, such requirement shall be deemed to require a legally sufficient description of any easements that are submitted to this chapter or that may be added to or withdrawn from the condominium, as the case may be. In the case of each such easement, the declaration shall contain:

(1)

A description of the permitted use or uses;

(2)

If less than all of those entitled to the use of all the units may utilize such easement, a statement of the relevant restrictions and limitations on utilization; and

(3)

If any persons other than those entitled to the use of the units may utilize such easement, a statement of the rights of others to utilization of the same.

(g)

Wherever this section requires a legally sufficient description of land that is submitted to this chapter or that may be added to or withdrawn from the condominium, an added requirement shall be a separate legally sufficient description of all lands in which the unit owners shall or may be tenants in common or joint tenants with any other persons, and a separate legally sufficient description of all lands in which the unit owners shall or may be life tenants. No units shall be situated on any such lands, however, and the declaration shall describe the nature of the unit owners’ estates therein. No such lands shall be shown on the same plat or plats showing other portions of the condominium, but shall be shown instead on separate plats.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title II, § 210, 23 DCR 9532b
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-233, § 2(n), 38 DCR 261
This section is referenced in § 42-1902.12, § 42-1902.13, § 42-1902.15, § 42-1902.19, § 42-1902.20, and § 42-1903.02.
1981 Ed., § 45-1820.
1973 Ed., § 5-1220.